Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB35.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The State Treasurer shall pay to the county the fee established in Section 2 of this Act,
and if applicable, the fees established in KRS 532.100(7) for each day a prisoner is
charged with a felony and lodged in the county jail, detention facility, or correctional
facility. The State Treasurer shall cease payment on the day that the prisoner is
acquitted of the felony charges against him or her, or has judgment rendered otherwise
involving no felony.
Section 2. KRS 431.215 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the judgment imposes a sentence of death or confinement in the penitentiary,
county jail, or other institution, two (2) certified copies thereof shall be furnished
forthwith to the sheriff who shall execute the same by delivering the defendant and
a certified copy of the judgment to the person in charge of the penitentiary, jail, or
institution of confinement and making a written return thereof in the office of the
circuit clerk within ten (10) days after the execution.
(2) When the judgment imposes a sentence of death or confinement in the penitentiary,
the county in which the prisoner is incarcerated shall receive from the State
Treasury a fee per day beginning on the day on which the prisoner is first lodged in
the county jail, detention facility, or correctional facility[judgment was rendered]
and ending the day that the prisoner[defendant] is delivered to the penitentiary. The
fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for use for the incarceration of prisoners as
provided in KRS 441.025.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/10/2024 9:37 AM Jacketed